Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 4
PROVIDERS - REIMBURSEMENT

25.5-4-401. Providers - payments - rules.

The state department shall establish rules for the payment of providers under this article and articles 5 and 6 of this title. Within the limits of available funds, such rules shall provide reasonable compensation to such providers, but no provider shall, by this section or any other provision of this article or article 5 or 6 of this title, be deemed to have any vested right to act as a provider under this article and articles 5 and 6 of this title or to receive any payment in addition to or different from that which is currently payable on behalf of a recipient at the time the medical benefits are provided by said provider.

On and after July 1, 1992, the state department rules established for the payment of providers under this article and articles 5 and 6 of this title shall provide that services that are compensable under both Title XIX and Title XVIII of the social security act shall be paid at either the rate established under Title XIX or the rate established under Title XVIII, whichever is lower.

If any provision of this paragraph (b) is found to be in conflict with any federal law or regulation, such conflicting portion of this paragraph (b) is declared to be inoperative to the extent of the conflict.

The state department shall exercise its overexpenditure authority under section 24-75-109, C.R.S., and shall not intentionally interrupt the normal provider payment schedule unless notified jointly by the director of the office of state planning and budgeting and the state controller that there is the possibility that adequate cash will not be available to make payments to providers and for other state expenses. If it is determined that adequate cash is not available and the state department does interrupt the normal payment cycle, the state department shall notify the joint budget committee of the general assembly and any affected providers in writing of its decision to interrupt the normal payment schedule. Nothing in this paragraph (c) shall be interpreted to establish a right for any provider to be paid during any specific billing cycle.

Repealed.

As to all payments made pursuant to this article and articles 5 and 6 of this title, the state department rules for the payment of providers may include provisions that encourage the highest quality of medical benefits and the provision thereof at the least expense possible.

As used in this subsection (3), "capitated" means a method of payment by which a provider directly delivers or arranges for delivery of medical care benefits for a term established by contract with the state department based on a fixed rate of reimbursement per recipient.

In order to provide medical benefits under this article and articles 5 and 6 of this title on a capitated basis and subject to the condition imposed in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (b), the state department is authorized to solicit negotiated contracts with providers based upon the requirements of this subsection (3). The state department may contract with one or more providers concerning the same medical services in a single geographic area.

The state department may award a contract to one or more providers pursuant to subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b) when the executive director determines that such contract will reduce the costs of providing medical benefits under this article and articles 5 and 6 of this title.

The state department may define groups of recipients by geographic area or other categories and may require that all members of the defined group obtain medical services through one or more provider contracts entered into pursuant to this subsection (3).

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that access to health-care services would be improved and costs of health care would be restrained if the recipients of the medicaid program would choose a primary care physician through a managed care provider. For purposes of this subsection (4), "managed care provider" means either a primary care physician program, a health maintenance organization, or a prepaid health plan.

Subject to the provisions of paragraph (c) of this subsection (4), the executive director of the state department has the authority to require a recipient of the medicaid program to select a managed care provider and to assign a recipient to a managed care provider if the recipient has failed to make a selection within a reasonable time. To the extent possible, this requirement shall be implemented on a statewide basis.

The state department shall ensure the following:

A managed care provider shall establish and implement consumer friendly procedures and instructions for disenrollment and shall have adequate staff to explain issues concerning service delivery and disenrollment procedures to recipients, including staff to address the communications needs and requirements of recipients with disabilities.

All recipients shall be adequately informed about service delivery options available to them consistent with the provisions of this subparagraph (II). If a recipient does not respond to a state department request for selection of a delivery option within forty-five calendar days, the state department shall send a second notification to the recipient. If the recipient does not respond within twenty days of the date of the second notification, the state department shall ensure that the recipient remains with the recipient's primary care physician, regardless of whether said primary care physician is enrolled in a health maintenance organization.

The state board may promulgate rules to provide for the implementation and administration of subsections (3) and (4) of this section.

The state department shall make good faith efforts to obtain a waiver or waivers from any requirements of Title XIX of the social security act which would prohibit the implementation of subsections (3) and (4) of this section. Such waiver or waivers shall be obtained from the federal department of health and human services, or any successor agency. If such waivers are not granted, the state department shall not act to implement or administer subsections (3) and (4) of this section to the extent that Title XIX prohibits it.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1841, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1)(d) added, (SB 09-265), ch. 205, p. 935, § 2, effective May 1.

L. 2010:

(1)(d) repealed, (HB 10-1382), ch. 217, p. 939, § 1, effective May 6.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-404 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-4-401.2. Performance-based payments - reporting - repeal.

To improve health outcomes and lower health-care costs, the state department may develop payments to providers that are based on quantifiable performance or measures of quality of care. These performance-based payments may include, but are not limited to, payments to:

Primary care providers;

Federally qualified health centers;

Providers of long-term care services and supports; and

Behavioral health providers, including, but not limited to:

Community mental health centers, as defined in section 27-66-101.

This subsection (1)(d)(I) is repealed, effective July 1, 2024.

Behavioral health safety net providers, as defined in section 27-50-101; and

Entities contracted with the state department to administer the statewide system of community behavioral health care established in section 25.5-5-402.

Prior to implementing performance-based payments in the medicaid program pursuant to this article 4 and articles 5 and 6 of this title 25.5, including performance-based payments set forth in this section, the state department shall submit to the joint budget committee:

(I) (A) Evidence that the performance-based payments are designed to achieve budget savings; or

(B) A budget request for costs associated with the performance-based payments;

(II) The estimated performance-based payments compared to total reimbursements for the affected service; and

(III) A description of the stakeholder engagement process for developing the performance-based payments, including the participants in the process and a summary of the stakeholder feedback, and the state department's response to stakeholder feedback.

The information required pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section must be provided on or before November 1 for performance-based payments that will take effect in the following fiscal year unless the state department includes with its submission an explanation of the need for faster implementation of the payment. If faster implementation is requested, the state department shall provide the information at least three months prior to the implementation of the performance-based payments unless compliance with federal law necessitates shorter notice.

On or before November 1, 2017, and on or before November 1 each year thereafter, the state department shall submit a report to the joint budget committee, the public health care and human services committee of the house of representatives, and the health and human services committee of the senate, or any successor committees, describing rules adopted by the state board and contract provisions approved by the centers for medicare and medicaid services in the preceding calendar year that authorize payments to providers based on performance. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), the report required pursuant to this subsection (3) continues indefinitely. The report must include, at a minimum:

A description of performance-based payments included in state board rules, including which performance standards are targeted with each performance-based payment;

A description of the goals and objectives of the performance-based payments, and how those goals and objectives align with other quality improvement initiatives;

A summary of the research-based evidence for the performance-based payments, to the extent such evidence is available;

A summary of the anticipated impact and clinical and nonclinical outcomes of implementing the performance-based payments;

A description of how the impact or outcomes will be evaluated;

An explanation of steps taken by the state department to limit the administrative burden on providers;

A summary of the stakeholder engagement process with respect to each performance-based payment, including major concerns raised through the stakeholder process and how those concerns were remediated;

When available, evaluation results for performance-based payments that were implemented in prior years; and

A description of proposed modifications to current performance-based payments.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire section added, (HB 17-1353), ch. 231, p. 898, § 3, effective May 23.

L. 2018:

(1)(d)(II) amended, (HB 18-1431), ch. 313, p. 1892, § 10, effective August 8.

L. 2022:

(1)(d) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1512, § 67, effective July 1.

25.5-4-401.5. Review of provider rates - advisory committee - recommendations - repeal.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (1) is effective until July 1, 2023.]

On or before September 1, 2015, the state department shall establish a schedule for an annual review of provider rates paid under the "Colorado Medical Assistance Act" so that each provider rate is reviewed at least every five years and shall provide the schedule to the joint budget committee. If the state department receives any petitions or proposals for provider rates to be reviewed or adjusted, the state department must forward a copy of the petition or proposal to the advisory committee.

The state department shall review each of the provider rates scheduled for review pursuant to the process described in this section. Additionally, the advisory committee established pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, by a majority vote, or the joint budget committee, by a majority vote, may direct that the state department conduct a review of a provider rate that is not scheduled for review during that year. The advisory committee or the joint budget committee shall notify the state department by December 1 of the year prior to the year in which the out-of-cycle review will take place of the request for an out-of-cycle review.

The state department may propose to exclude rates from the schedule established pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) if those rates are adjusted on a periodic basis as a result of other state statute or federal law or regulation. The state department shall include the proposed list of exclusions with the schedule established pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (1).

The advisory committee or the joint budget committee may, by a majority vote, direct the state department to include any rate that the state department has proposed to exclude from the schedule.

(1) [Editor's note: This version of subsection (1) is effective July 1, 2023.]

(a) On or before September 1, 2023, the state department shall establish a schedule for an annual review of provider rates paid under the "Colorado Medical Assistance Act" so that each provider rate is reviewed at least every three years and shall provide the schedule to the advisory committee established pursuant to subsection (3) of this section and the joint budget committee. If the state department receives any petitions or proposals for provider rates to be reviewed or adjusted, the state department shall forward a copy of the petition or proposal to the advisory committee and the joint budget committee.

(b) The state department shall review each of the provider rates scheduled for review pursuant to the process described in this section. The advisory committee or the joint budget committee may, by a majority vote, direct that the state department conduct a review of a provider rate that is not scheduled for review during that year. The advisory committee or the joint budget committee shall notify the state department of the request for an out-of-cycle review by December 1 of the year prior to the year in which the out-of-cycle review will take place. If the state department determines that the request for an out-of-cycle review cannot be conducted, the state department shall provide written notification to the advisory committee and the joint budget committee within thirty days after the request for an out-of-cycle review. The notification must include a description of the reasons the out-of-cycle review cannot be conducted.

(c) (I) The state department may propose to exclude rates from the schedule established pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section if those rates are adjusted on a periodic basis as a result of other state statute or federal law or regulation. The state department shall include the proposed list of exclusions with the schedule established pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section.

(II) The advisory committee or the joint budget committee may, by a majority vote, direct the state department to include any rate that the state department has proposed to exclude from the schedule.

to the advisory committee, the joint budget committee, and any stakeholder groups identified by the state department whose rates are reviewed.

(2)

(a) [Editor's note: This version of subsection (2)(a) is effective July 1, 2023.] In the first phase of the review process, the state department shall conduct an analysis of the access, service, quality, and utilization of each service subject to a provider rate review. The state department shall compare the rates paid with available benchmarks, including medicare rates and usual and customary rates paid by private pay parties, and use qualitative tools to assess whether payments are sufficient to allow for provider retention and client access and to support appropriate reimbursement of high-value services.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (2)(b) is effective until July 1, 2023.] Following the report required by paragraph (a) of this subsection (2), the state department shall work with the advisory committee and any stakeholders identified by the state department to review the report and develop strategies for responding to the findings, including any nonfiscal approaches or rebalancing of rates.

(b)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (2)(b) is effective July 1, 2023.

]

Following the analysis required by subsection (2)(a) of this section, the state department shall work with the advisory committee and any stakeholders identified by the state department or the advisory committee to review the analysis and develop strategies for responding to the findings, including any nonfiscal approaches or rebalancing of rates and strategies to address capacity issues that may exist in certain regions of the state.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (2)(c) is effective until July 1, 2023.] Following the review required by paragraph (b) of this subsection (2), the state department shall work with the office of state planning and budgeting to determine achievable goals and executive branch priorities within the statewide budget.

(c)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (2)(c) is effective July 1, 2023.

]

Following the review required by subsection (2)(b) of this section, the state department shall work with the office of state planning and budgeting to determine achievable goals and executive branch priorities within the statewide budget.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (2)(d) is effective until May 1, 2025.] Notwithstanding the provisions of section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), on or before November 1, 2016, and each November 1 thereafter, the state department shall submit a written report to the joint budget committee and the advisory committee containing its recommendations on all of the provider rates reviewed pursuant to this section and all of the data relied upon by the state department in making its recommendations. The joint budget committee shall consider the recommendations in formulating the budget for the state department.

(d)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (2)(d) is effective May 1, 2025.

]

(I) Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), on or before November 1, 2025, and each November 1 thereafter, the state department shall submit a written report to the joint budget committee and the advisory committee on the analysis required pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section, a description of the information discussed during the quarterly public meeting conducted pursuant to subsection (2)(e) of this section, and the state department's recommendations on all of the provider rates reviewed pursuant to this section and all of the data relied upon by the state department in making the recommendations. The joint budget committee shall consider the recommendations in formulating the state department's budget.

(II) The state department shall submit, as part of the report required pursuant to this subsection (2)(d), a description of the information discussed during the quarterly public meeting; the state department's response to the public comments received from providers, recipients, and other interested parties; and an explanation of how the public comments informed the provider rate review process and the recommendations concerning provider rates.

[Editor's note: Subsection (2)(e) is effective July 1, 2023.] The state department shall conduct a public meeting at least quarterly to inform the state department's review of provider rates paid under the "Colorado Medical Assistance Act". The state department shall invite to the public meeting providers, recipients, and other interested parties directly affected by the services scheduled to be reviewed at the public meeting. At a minimum, each public meeting must consist of, but is not limited to:

A discussion of the analysis and review performed pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section; and

Public comments from providers, recipients, and other interested parties concerning:

The analysis and review performed pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section; and

Recommended changes to the provider rate review process that may enhance or improve the process.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (3) is effective until December 1, 2022.]

There is created in the state department the medicaid provider rate review advisory committee, referred to in this section as the "advisory committee", to assist the state department in the review of the provider rate reimbursements under the "Colorado Medical Assistance Act". The advisory committee shall:

Review the schedule for annual review of provider rates established by the state department pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section and recommend any changes to the schedule;

Review the reports prepared by the state department on its analysis of provider rates pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of this section and provide comments and feedback to the state department on the reports;

With the state department, conduct public meetings to allow providers, recipients, and other interested parties an opportunity to comment on the report required by paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of this section;

Review proposals or petitions for provider rates to be reviewed or adjusted received by the advisory committee;

Determine whether any provider rates not scheduled for review during the next calendar year should be reviewed during that calendar year;

Recommend to the state department and to the joint budget committee any changes to the process of reviewing provider rates, including measures to increase access to the process such as by providing for electronic comments by providers and the public; and

Provide other assistance to the state department as requested by the state department or the joint budget committee.

The advisory committee consists of the following twenty-four members:

The following members appointed by the president of the senate:

A recipient with a disability or a representative of recipients with a disability;

A representative of hospitals providing services to recipients recommended by a statewide association of hospitals;

A representative of providers of transportation;

A representative of rural health centers;

A representative of home health providers recommended by a statewide organization of home health providers; and

A representative of providers of durable medical equipment recommended by a statewide association of durable medical equipment providers;

The following members appointed by the minority leader of the senate:

A representative of providers of behavioral health-care services;

A representative of primary care physicians who see recipients recommended by a statewide association of primary care physicians;

A representative of dentists providing services to recipients recommended by a statewide association of dentists;

A representative of federally qualified health centers;

A representative of nonmedical home- and community-based service providers; and

A representative of providers serving recipients with intellectual and developmental disabilities;

The following members appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives:

A representative of child recipients with a disability;

A representative of specialty care physicians not employed by a hospital who see recipients recommended by a statewide association whose members include at least one-third of the doctors of medicine or osteopathy licensed by the state;

A representative of providers of alternative care facilities recommended by a statewide association of alternative care facilities;

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (3)(b)(III)(D) is effective until July 1, 2024.] A representative of single entry point agencies;

(D)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (3)(b)(III)(D) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

A representative of case management agencies;

A representative of ambulatory surgical centers;

A representative of hospice providers recommended by a statewide association of hospice and palliative care providers; and

The following members appointed by the minority leader of the house of representatives:

A representative of substance use disorder providers recommended by a statewide association of substance use disorder providers;

A representative of facility-based physicians who see recipients. For purposes of this sub-subparagraph (B), "facility-based physicians" include anesthesiologists, emergency room physicians, neonatologists, pathologists, and radiologists.

A representative of pharmacists providing services to recipients;

A representative of managed care health plans;

A representative of advanced practice registered nurses recommended by a statewide association of nurses; and

A representative of physical therapists or occupational therapists recommended by a statewide association representing occupational or physical therapists.

The appointing authorities shall make their initial appointments to the advisory committee no later than August 1, 2015. In making appointments to the advisory committee, the appointing authorities shall make a concerted effort to include members of diverse political, racial, cultural, income, and ability groups and members from urban and rural areas.

Each member of the advisory committee serves at the pleasure of the official who appointed the member. Each member of the advisory committee serves a four-year term and may be reappointed.

The members of the advisory committee serve without compensation and without reimbursement for expenses.

At the first meeting of the advisory committee, to be held on or after September 1, 2015, the members shall elect a chair and vice-chair from among the members.

The advisory committee shall meet at least once every quarter. The chair may call such additional meetings as may be necessary for the advisory committee to complete its duties.

The advisory committee shall develop bylaws and procedures to govern its operations.

This subsection (3) is repealed, effective September 1, 2025.

Prior to repeal, the department of regulatory agencies shall conduct a sunset review of the advisory committee pursuant to the provisions of section 2-3-1203, C.R.S.

(3) [Editor's note: This version of subsection (3) is effective December 1, 2022.]

(a) There is created in the state department the medicaid provider rate review advisory committee, referred to in this section as the "advisory committee", to assist the state department in the review of the provider rate reimbursements under the "Colorado Medical Assistance Act". The advisory committee shall:

(I) Review the schedule for annual review of provider rates established by the state department pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section and recommend any changes to the schedule;

(II) Review the analysis performed pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section and the reports prepared by the state department on its analysis of provider rates pursuant to subsection (2)(d) of this section and provide comments and feedback to the state department and the joint budget committee on the reports;

Review the comments received from providers, recipients, and other interested parties and the state department's response to the comments required pursuant to subsection (2)(d)(II) of this section;

Review proposals or petitions received by the advisory committee for provider rates to be reviewed or adjusted;

Determine whether any provider rates not scheduled for review during the next calendar year should be reviewed during that calendar year;

Recommend to the state department and to the joint budget committee any changes to the process of reviewing provider rates, including measures to increase access to the process, such as by providing for electronic comments by providers and the public; and

Provide other assistance to the state department and the joint budget committee as requested by the state department or the joint budget committee.

(b) (I) The advisory committee consists of the following seven members:

Three members appointed by the governor;

Two members appointed by the president of the senate, or the president's designee; and

Two members appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, or the speaker's designee.

(II) Each member appointed to the advisory committee must have proven expertise related to the medical assistance program in one or more of the following areas:

(A) Service delivery or case management services provided to one or more eligible populations;

(B) Provider finance or budget;

(C) Service capacity analysis;

Business processes;

Claims filing or processing; or

Implementation of state and federal medicaid rules, regulations, and guidance.

(III) The state department may make recommendations to the governor, the president of the senate, and the speaker of the house of representatives concerning the qualifications of members appointed to the advisory committee.

(c) The appointing authorities shall make initial appointments to the advisory committee no later than January 1, 2023. In making appointments to the advisory committee, the appointing authorities shall make a concerted effort to include members of diverse political, racial, cultural, income, and ability groups and members from urban and rural areas.

(d) Each member of the advisory committee serves at the pleasure of the official who appointed the member. Each member of the advisory committee serves a four-year term and may be reappointed.

(e) The members of the advisory committee serve without compensation and without reimbursement for expenses.

(f) At the first meeting of the advisory committee, to be held on or after March 1, 2023, the members shall elect a chair and vice-chair from among the members.

(g) The advisory committee shall meet at least once every quarter. The chair may call additional meetings as may be necessary for the advisory committee to complete its duties.

(h) The advisory committee shall develop bylaws and procedures to govern its operations.

On or before December 1, 2023, and each December 1 thereafter, the advisory committee shall present to the joint budget committee an overview of the provider rate review process, a summary of the provider rates that were reviewed, and the strategies for responding to the findings of the provider rate review, including any fiscal or nonfiscal approaches or rebalancing of rates, any advisory committee recommendations for rate adjustments made to the state department, and any recommendations for improving capacity and access to services in regions of the state where reduced capacity results in limited access to services.

This subsection (3) is repealed, effective September 1, 2034.

Prior to repeal, the department of regulatory agencies shall conduct a sunset review of the advisory committee pursuant to the provisions of section 2-3-1203.

Source:

L. 2015:

Entire section added, (SB 15-228), ch. 288, p. 1177, § 1, effective June 5.

L. 2017:

(2)(a) and (2)(d) amended, (HB 17-1060), ch. 6, p. 17, § 9, effective March 1.

L. 2021:

(3)(b)(III)(D) amended, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, p. 332, § 25, effective July 1, 2024.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (SB 22-236), ch. 410, p. 2897, § 1, effective July 1, 2023.

25.5-4-402. Providers - hospital reimbursement - hospital review program - rules.

For all licensed or certified hospitals contracting for services under this article and articles 5 and 6 of this title, except those hospitals operated by the department of human services or those hospitals deemed exempt by the state board, the state department shall pay for inpatient hospital services pursuant to a system of prospective payment, generally based on the elements of a diagnosis-related group system. The state department shall develop and administer a system for ensuring appropriate utilization and quality of care provided by those providers who are reimbursed under this section. Subject to available appropriations, the state department may also make supplemental medicaid payments to certain hospitals. The state board shall promulgate rules to provide for the implementation of this section.

A hospital that receives payment under this article and articles 5 and 6 of this title for telemedicine services shall employ its existing quality-of-care protocols and patient confidentiality guidelines to ensure that such services meet the requirements of this article and articles 5 and 6 of this title.

The executive director of the state department shall adopt rules in furtherance of this subsection (2), including, without limitation, rules to:

Ensure the provision of appropriate care to patients;

Prevent fraud and abuse; and

Establish methods and procedures to avoid overuse of telemedicine services.

In addition to the reimbursement rate process described in subsection (1) of this section and subject to adequate funding being made available pursuant to section 25.5-4-402.4, the Colorado healthcare affordability and sustainability enterprise created in section 25.5-4-402.4 (3) shall pay an additional amount based upon performance to those hospitals that provide services that improve health-care outcomes for their patients. The state department shall determine this amount based upon nationally recognized performance measures established in rules adopted by the state board. The state quality standards must be consistent with federal quality standards published by an organization with expertise in health-care quality, including but not limited to, the centers for medicare and medicaid services, the agency for healthcare research and quality, or the national quality forum.

The amount of the payments made pursuant to this subsection (3) shall be computed annually. For the first two fiscal years that payments are made pursuant to this subsection (3), the total amount of the payments shall be up to five percent of the total reimbursements made to hospitals in the previous year. For each fiscal year after the first two fiscal years, the total amount of the payments shall be up to seven percent of the total reimbursements made to hospitals in the previous year.

Subject to federal approval, and notwithstanding any other provision of the "Colorado Medical Assistance Act", the state department shall design and implement an evidence-based hospital review program to ensure appropriate utilization of hospital services.

Consistent with federal regulations set forth in 42 CFR 456, the hospital review program may include the following:

Preadmission review;

Continued stay review;

Transfer planning;

Discharge planning;

Care coordination; and

Retrospective claims review.

The following factors must be considered in any coverage determinations made pursuant to the hospital review programs:

Information provided, diagnosis determined, and treatment recommended by the treating provider or providers;

Evidence-based clinical coverage criteria and recipient coverage guidelines as established by the state department;

Nationally recognized utilization and technology assessment guidelines; and

Industry standard criteria, as appropriate.

The state department shall consult with affected stakeholders prior to implementation of the hospital review program. At a minimum, the state department shall solicit feedback from recipients, hospitals within Colorado that participate in medicaid, providers participating in the accountable care collaborative pursuant to section 25.5-5-419, and the Colorado healthcare affordability and sustainability enterprise board established in section 25.5-4-402.4 (7). If the state department contracts with a third-party vendor to implement the hospital review program, the state department shall require the vendor to participate in the stakeholder outreach with hospitals required pursuant to this subsection (4)(d)(I).

Prior to implementation of the hospital review program, the state department shall provide an opportunity for hospitals to test connectivity to and workability of any new electronic interface created or implemented as part of this section. The state department shall select a limited group of hospitals to test any new requirements prior to full implementation.

The state department shall provide a report to the joint budget committee by November 1, 2018, on the status of the implementation of the hospital review program. The report must include the comments received as part of the stakeholder process described in subsection (4)(d)(I) of this section and a description of, and any available results from, the testing process described in subsection (4)(d)(II) of this section.

The state department shall provide a report to the joint budget committee on November 1, 2019, and November 1, 2020, detailing the estimates of the cost savings achieved and the impact of the cost-control measures authorized pursuant to this section on recipients and recipients' health outcomes.

Beginning in 2018, and every year thereafter through 2020, the state department shall report on the status of the implementation of the hospital review program, any cost savings estimated or achieved due to the program, and the impact on recipients and recipients' outcomes of any cost-control measures as part of its "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act" hearing required by section 2-7-203.

The state board shall adopt any rules necessary for the administration and implementation of this section.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1844, § 7, effective July 1; entire section amended, p. 1546, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1) amended and (3) added, (HB 09-1293), ch. 152, p. 645, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

(3)(a) amended, (SB 17-267), ch. 267, p. 1448, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

(4) added, (SB 18-266), ch. 264, p. 1624, § 2, effective May 29.

25.5-4-402.3. Providers - hospital - provider fees - legislative declaration - federal waiver - fund created - rules - advisory board - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (HB 09-1293), ch. 152, p. 633, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(4)(b)(VIII) added, (SB 10-169), ch. 307, p. 1445, § 1, effective May 27; (4)(b)(IV) amended, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2110, § 141, effective August 11.

L. 2011:

(3)(a)(II) and (3)(a)(III) amended and (3)(a)(IV), (4)(b)(IX), and (5)(b.5) added, (SB 11-212), ch. 146, pp. 508, 509, §§ 1, 2, 3, effective May 5.

L. 2013:

(4)(b)(IV)(A) and (4)(b)(IV)(C) amended, (SB 13-200), ch. 216, p. 897, § 1, effective May 13.

L. 2017:

(5)(b.3) added, (SB 17-256), ch. 198, p. 720, § 1, effective May 8; entire section repealed, (SB 17-267), ch. 267, p. 1448, § 16, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Section 34 of chapter 267 (SB 17-267), Session Laws of Colorado 2017, provides that the section of the act repealing this section does not take effect if the centers for medicare and medicaid services determine that the amendments do not comply with federal law. For more information, see SB 17-267. (L. 2017, p. 1478.) The executive director of the department of health care policy and financing did not notify the revisor of statutes by June 1, 2017, of such determination; therefore, the repeal of this section took effect July 1, 2017.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-267, see section 1 of chapter 267, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.